Mississippi, session 2026, SB3120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-33-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-33-67.  (1)  Each qualified homeowner under sixty-five (65) years of age on January 1 of the year for which the exemption is claimed, and who is not totally disabled as herein defined shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes in the amount prescribed in Section 27-33-69, 27-33-71, 27-33-73 or 27-33-75, whichever is applicable to the year for which the exemption is claimed. (2)  Each qualified homeowner who has reached sixty-five (65) years of age on or before January 1 of the year for which the exemption is claimed, who is totally disabled as herein defined, or who is the unremarried surviving spouse of a homeowner referred to in paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this subsection (2), shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes in the manner prescribed in Section 27-33-75. To qualify for the exemptions provided for in this article because of disability, the homeowner must present proper proof of any of the following: (a)  Service-connected, total disability as an American veteran who has been honorably discharged from military service. (b)  Classification as totally disabled under the federal Social Security Act (42 USCS Section 416(i)), the Railroad Retirement Act or any other federal act approved by the Department of Revenue. (i)  If a person is eligible for classification as totally disabled under the federal acts referred to in this subsection (2)(b), but does not qualify to receive benefits thereunder because his annual income exceeds an amount set as the maximum allowed in qualifying to receive the benefits, then he is eligible for the disability exemptions specified in this article.  Proper proof of such eligibility shall be determined by the Department of Revenue. (ii)  If a person is eligible for classification as totally disabled under the federal Social Security Act (42 USCS Section 416(i)), but does not qualify to receive benefits thereunder only because he has not made the necessary social security contributions, then he is eligible for the disability exemptions specified in this article.  Proper proof of such eligibility shall be determined by the Department of Revenue.  The provisions of this subparagraph (ii) shall apply to any homeowner filing for the disability exemption on or after January 1, 1992. (c)  Classification as totally disabled under the provisions of a retirement plan that is considered to be qualified under the United States Internal Revenue Code.  The determination of whether or not a retirement plan is so qualified shall be made by the Department of Revenue. (d)  Classification as totally disabled as determined by the Department of Revenue pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Revenue. Proper proof of classification as totally disabled under the federal acts referred to in subsection (2)(b) or (2)(c), including proof of the total disability and of eligibility to qualify to receive benefits under the relevant federal act or qualified retirement plan, shall be determined by the Department of Revenue. The property owned jointly by husband and wife and property owned in fee simple by either spouse, if either spouse shall fulfill the age or disability requirement, shall be eligible for the exemption allowed in this article in full.  On all other jointly owned property, the amount of the allowable exemption shall be determined on the basis of each individual joint owner's qualifications and pro rata share of the property. (3)  Those homeowners and unremarried surviving spouses described in subsection (2) of this section and who qualify for the exemptions under this article shall also be exempt from the forest acreage tax authorized by Section 49-19-115 applicable to property included in the homestead. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.